Washington statutes.
RCW 43.290.040

Identification of countries of strategic importance for international trade relations.

(1) The office of international relations and protocol and the legislative committee on economic development and international relations, in consultation with the department of commerce, the department of agriculture, the office of the secretary of state, and other state agencies and offices as appropriate, shall jointly identify up to 15 foreign jurisdictions that are of strategic importance to the development and diversification of Washington's international trade relations.

(2) When designating such jurisdictions of strategic importance, the office and committee shall consider factors including:

(a) Existing or potential partnerships in key industrial sectors;

(b) The presence of cultural and people-to-people ties;

(c) The state's economic development priorities and shared interests, consistent with the state strategic international engagement plan;

(d) The presence of international trade offices or other program-based engagement conducted by state agencies; and

(e) Historic or existing bilateral agreements established on a government-to-government basis.

(3) A foreign jurisdiction may not be designated as a jurisdiction of strategic importance under this section if it is currently subject to United States government sanctions for and has been identified by the United States department of state as being engaged in state-sponsored terrorism.

[ 2024 c 336 s 4; 2023 c 470 s 2081; 1996 c 253 s 303. Formerly RCW 43.330.065.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Part headings not law—1996 c 253: See notes following RCW 28B.109.010.